Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
County Jail Budget and Funding

441.206.
State contribution for jail — Allocation — Payments to be made annually — Use of funds.

For the care and maintenance of prisoners charged with or convicted of violations of state law, each county shall receive a contribution from the State Treasury in an amount equal to that paid to the county pursuant to this section in fiscal year 1983-84 or the amount that should have been paid to the county in fiscal year 1983-84 under the conditions set forth in subsection (5) of this section. Any additional moneys appropriated for county jails shall be allocated on the basis of a formula comprised of the following factors:

Sixty percent (60%) of the allocation shall be based on the amount of the 1983-84 funding formula each county received, or should have received under the conditions set forth in subsection (5) of this section;

Ten percent (10%) of the allocation shall be based on each county’s comparative ranking of median household income in inverse order, as determined by the 1980 federal census of population; and

Thirty percent (30%) of the allocation shall be based on the proportion of each county’s age at risk population (18-34) to the state total, as determined by the 1980 federal census of population.

Payments of the state contribution for jail operating expenses shall be made annually, no later than July 31 of each year, by the Department of Corrections to the county treasurer. The election by a county to close its jail and to contract with another county for the incarceration of prisoners, as permitted by KRS

441.025

, shall not affect the state contribution provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

All state funds paid to a county under this section, any funds paid to a county by the United States government, a city, or another county for the incarceration of prisoners and any interest earned on the funds shall be expended on the incarceration of prisoners, as provided in KRS

441.025

. Any funds paid under subsection (1) of this section and any interest earned on the funds shall be expended on the incarceration of prisoners, in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

441.055

, within twelve (12) months of the close of the fiscal year in which the funds were received. Any funds received by a county under subsection (1) of this section that are not expended for this purpose shall be returned to the State Treasury.

A county shall not receive less than twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000) pursuant to this section from the State Treasury for the care and maintenance of prisoners charged with or convicted of violations of state law.

If the capacity of a jail was substantially increased during the years 1980 through 1982 due to construction or renovation, and if, a result, the amount paid to the county in fiscal year 1983-84 pursuant to this section and to 1982 Ky. Acts ch. 385, sec. 3, was not representative of the true jail population, then the commissioner of the Department of Corrections may, upon proper documentation by the county, permit an estimate of the current capacity of the jail to be used as a basis for calculating the amount that should have been paid to the county in fiscal year 1983-84. The estimate of current capacity shall be used to calculate payments made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section after July 14, 1992, but shall not be used to recalculate past payments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 3, effective July 1, 1982; reen. and amend. 1984, ch. 415, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 211, § 122, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 106, effective June 8, 2011.

441.207.
Local corrections assistance fund.

The local corrections assistance fund is created as a separate revolving fund to be administered by the department. The fund shall consist of amounts transferred to the fund pursuant to the provisions of KRS

196.288

, along with any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for purposes of the fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings from the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund and shall be retained in the fund until the General Assembly establishes a statutory process and method for distributing the funds to local correctional facilities and programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 69, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, sec. 69, directed that a new section of KRS Chapter 196 be created for this statute. However, during codification, the Reviser of Statutes determined that it was more appropriately placed within KRS Chapter 441, relating to jails and county prisoners, and created the new section as KRS

441.207

under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

441.210.
“Station house” defined. [Repealed.]

441.215.
Jail budget preparation.

By April 1 of each year, the county judge/executive, county treasurer, and jailer shall prepare and submit to the fiscal court a proposed line item jail budget and an estimate of revenues for jail operations from federal, state, and local sources. The proposed jail budget and estimate of revenues shall be included in the proposed county budget and investigated by the fiscal court as provided in KRS

68.240

.

The state local finance officer shall supervise and direct the form and classifications of the line item jail budget and estimate of jail revenues.

The fiscal court shall consult with the jailer prior to any amendment of the jail budget. The fiscal court shall possess sole authority to transfer funds between line items.

If, in the opinion of the jailer, the jail budget as proposed or as amended by the fiscal court, fails to adequately provide for the safe and secure operation of the jail or the care of prisoners, the jailer shall submit a written statement of his concerns along with any available documentation, to the fiscal court and, if the jail holds state prisoners, to the Department of Corrections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 328, § 6, effective April 9, 1988; 1992, ch. 211, § 123, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 108, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although a jailer, in view of subsection (1), must cooperate with the county judge/executive and the county treasurer in the preparation of a proposed line item jail budget, the jailer could prepare a separate jail budget proposal, and tender it to the fiscal court pursuant to subsection (4).

OAG 91-183

.

The fiscal court could adopt the jailer’s budget proposal into the overall county budget through its amendment authority pursuant to KRS 68.240(6), and thereby eliminate or modify the jail budget proposed by the county judge/executive.

OAG 91-183

.

441.220.
Female prisoners in city of first class — Mayor to designate places of detention. [Repealed.]

441.225.
Expenditures from jail budget — Payment of jail personnel.

Except for capital improvements, utilities and building insurance and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the jailer shall have authority to authorize expenditures from the jail budget. Such expenditures shall only be made in accordance with the line item jail budget duly adopted or amended by the fiscal court and the established county procurement code or purchase order procedure of the county. Payment for purchases for the jail shall be subject to fiscal court approval prior to payment. The fiscal court shall not withhold approval of payment for jail expenditures which are within the jail budget and not unlawful.

The jailer shall submit, in accordance with county payroll procedures, time reports for all full-time and part-time jail personnel and employees to the county treasurer or other designated payroll official. The county treasurer shall review and pay such claims in accordance with policies and procedures for the payment of other county employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; reen. and amend. 1984, ch. 415, § 18, effective July 13, 1984.

441.230.
Matrons for county jail — Appointment, salary and quarters. [Repealed.]

441.235.
Jail accounts and financial records.

The county treasurer shall keep books of accounts of all receipts and disbursements from the jail budget and make such reports as are required by the state local finance officer.

The county treasurer, in cooperation with the jailer, shall monthly report to the fiscal court on:

All purchases from the jail account for the preceding month for final fiscal court approval; and

The current condition of the jail account, including all jail revenues received, expenditures for the month, expenditures for the year-to-date and unexpended balances by line item.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 4, effective June 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

441.240.
Assistant matrons for station houses — Appointment, salary and quarters. [Repealed.]

441.245.
Salary for jailer who operates full-service jail — Fiscal court to annually detail the duties and compensation of jailer not subject to salary schedule — Jailer’s quarterly reports.

The jailer who operates a full-service jail shall receive a monthly salary pursuant to any salary schedule in KRS Chapter 64 applicable to jailers operating a full-service jail from the county jail operating budget.

No jailer holding office in the Commonwealth on or after January 6, 1999, shall receive an annual salary of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

The salaries of jailers who are not subject to any salary schedule in KRS Chapter 64 may be set at a higher level if the salary does not exceed the constitutional salary limit applicable to jailers. These jailers’ salaries shall at least equal the prior year’s level and may be adjusted by the fiscal court for the change in the prior year’s consumer price index according to the provisions of KRS

64.527

.

For jailers governed by this subsection:

By May 1 of each year, the fiscal court shall pass a resolution detailing:

The duties to be performed by the jailer in the upcoming fiscal year; and

The compensation for the jailer for the upcoming fiscal year, including any cost-of-living adjustments according to the provisions of KRS

64.527

; and

On a quarterly basis, jailers shall submit to the fiscal court a summary of all official duties performed by the jailer and the jailer’s deputies, to include information related to prisoner transport, including but not limited to:

The prisoner’s name;

The location and time the prisoner was placed in the custody of the jailer or the jailer’s deputies for transport;

The location and time the jailer or the jailer’s deputies relinquished custody of the prisoner after transport; and

The mileage driven.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 5, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 595, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 610, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 21, 2017.

441.250.
Qualifications and term of matrons. [Repealed.]

441.255.
Cost of incarceration when change of venue granted.

When a change of venue is granted, the cost of incarcerating the defendant shall be paid by the county from which the action is removed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 415, § 17, effective July 13, 1984.

441.260.
Hours and duties of matrons. [Repealed.]

441.265.
Required reimbursement by prisoner of costs of confinement — Waiver of outstanding expenses and reimbursement if prisoner not convicted — Local policy of fee and expense rates — Adjustments to per diem rate — Billing and collection methods.

A prisoner in a county jail shall be required beginning from the prisoner’s booking date to reimburse the county for expenses incurred by reason of the prisoner’s confinement as set out in this section, except for good cause shown.

If the prisoner is not convicted of any charges brought as a result of the prisoner’s arrest, the county jail shall waive any outstanding expenses owed by the prisoner and reimburse the prisoner for any expenses already paid to the county jail for confinement due to that arrest, but the county jail shall not be required to waive or reimburse any expenses incurred by the prisoner for confinement related to a prior arrest, or for property damage or injury caused by the prisoner while confined to the jail.

The jailer may adopt, with the approval of the county’s governing body, a prisoner fee and expense reimbursement policy, which may include, but not be limited to, the following:

An administrative processing or booking fee;

A per diem for room and board of not more than fifty dollars ($50) per day or the actual per diem cost, whichever is less, for the entire period of time the prisoner is confined to the jail. Not later than the second Friday in February of each year, the Department of Corrections shall adjust the fifty dollar ($50) maximum per diem for room and board at a rate accounting for any percentage increase or decrease in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, All Items, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, using 2022 as the base year;

Actual charges for medical and dental treatment; and

Reimbursement for county property damaged or any injury caused by the prisoner while confined to the jail.

Rates charged may be adjusted in accordance with the fee and expense reimbursement policy based upon the ability of the prisoner confined to the jail to pay, giving consideration to any legal obligation of the prisoner to support a spouse, minor children, or other dependents. The prisoner’s interest in any jointly owned property and the income, assets, earnings, or other property owned by the prisoner’s spouse or family shall not be used to determine a prisoner’s ability to pay.

The jailer or his or her designee may bill and attempt to collect any amount owed which remains unpaid. The governing body of the county may, upon the advice of the jailer, contract with one (1) or more public agencies or private vendors to perform this billing and collection. Within twelve (12) months after the date of the prisoner’s release from confinement, the county attorney, jailer, or the jailer’s designee, may file a civil action to seek reimbursement from that prisoner for any amount owed which remains unpaid.

Any fees or reimbursement received under this section shall be forwarded to the county treasurer for placement in the jail’s budget.

The governing body of the county may require a prisoner who is confined in the county jail to pay a reasonable fee, not exceeding actual cost, for any medical treatment or service received by the prisoner. However, no prisoner confined in the jail shall be denied any necessary medical care because of inability to pay.

Payment of any required fees may be automatically deducted from the prisoner’s property or canteen account. If the prisoner has no funds in his or her account, a deduction may be made creating a negative balance. If funds become available or if the prisoner reenters the jail at a later date, the fees may be deducted from the prisoner’s property or canteen account. Automatic deductions from a prisoner’s canteen account shall be made as follows:

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of an initial deposit in the prisoner’s account may be deducted for:

Any amount owed by the prisoner that is associated with a confinement for a prior arrest; and

Fees and expenses incurred pursuant to subsection (2)(a)4. of this section; and

Up to fifty percent (50%) of any subsequent deposit in the prisoner’s account for all expenses incurred by reason of the prisoner’s confinement as set out in this section.

Prior to the prisoner’s release, the jailer or his or her designee may work with the confined prisoner to create a reimbursement plan to be implemented upon the prisoner’s release. At the end of the prisoner’s incarceration, the prisoner shall be presented with a billing statement produced by the jailer or designee. After the prisoner’s release, the jailer or his or her designee may, after negotiation with the prisoner, release the prisoner from all or part of the prisoner’s repayment obligation if the jailer believes that the prisoner will be unable to pay the full amount due.

No per diem shall be charged to any prisoner who is required to pay a work release fee pursuant to KRS

439.179

, a prisoner that has been ordered to pay a reimbursement fee by the court pursuant to KRS

534.045

, or that the Department of Corrections is financially responsible for housing.

No medical reimbursement, except that provided for in KRS

441.045

, shall be charged to any prisoner that the Department of Corrections is financially responsible for housing.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 537, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2022 ch. 188, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

441.270.
Matron to attend court — Be present when female searched. [Repealed.]

441.280.
Notification of matron on receipt of female or child. [Repealed.]

441.290.
Jail visiting board in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

441.300.
Jail physician in counties containing 150,000 population. [Repealed.]

441.310.
Chaplain for jail in counties containing city of first class. [Repealed.]

441.320.
City jailer and deputy in cities of second class. [Repealed.]

441.330.
City jailer may allow time off sentence. [Repealed.]